Maryland, session 2025, HB0242.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Real Property
8–218.
(a) (1) In this section[, “reusable] THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE
MEANINGS INDICATED.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0242*

HOUSE BILL 242
(2) (I) “CONSUMER CREDIT HISTORY” MEANS ANY WRITTEN
ACCOUNT BY A CREDIT REPORTING AGENCY BEARING ON A CONSUMER’S
CREDITWORTHINESS, CREDIT STANDING, OR CREDIT CAPACITY.
(II) “CONSUMER CREDIT HISTORY” INCLUDES:
1. A CONSUMER CREDIT REPORT; AND
2. A CREDIT SCORE.
(3) “REUSABLE tenant screening report” means a report prepared within
the previous 30 days by a consumer reporting agency at the request and expense of a
prospective tenant and made directly available to a prospective landlord at no charge for
use in the rental application process.
(b) (1) A reusable tenant screening report shall contain the following
information regarding a prospective tenant:
[(1) A credit report;
(2)] (I) For each jurisdiction indicated as a prior residence of the
prospective tenant, regardless of whether the residence is reported by the prospective
tenant or by a consumer reporting agency preparing a consumer report:
[(i)] 1. A comprehensive criminal history records check for all
federal, state, and local charges against and convictions of the prospective tenant over the
previous 7 years; and
[(ii)] 2. A comprehensive eviction history for all state and local
jurisdictions for the previous 7 years;
[(3)] (II) Verification of employment and income; and
[(4)] (III) Current address and rental history.
(2) A REUSABLE TENANT SCREENING REPORT MAY NOT CONTAIN A
CONSUMER CREDIT HISTORY.
(c) (1) A landlord shall notify prospective tenants regarding whether or not
the landlord accepts reusable tenant screening reports.
(2) Notice under paragraph (1) of this subsection may be in writing or by
posting notice in a conspicuous manner, including:
(i) A statement posted on a rental housing listing;

HOUSE BILL 242 3
(ii) Notice posted on the homepage of a website;
(iii) Information provided in the rental application page for a rental
property online; or
(iv) Any other manner reasonably calculated to provide potential
tenants with notice.
(d) If a prospective tenant provides a reusable tenant screening report to a
landlord that accepts reusable tenant screening reports, the landlord may not charge the
prospective tenant:
(1) A fee for the landlord to access the report; or
(2) An application fee.
(e) A landlord that accepts a reusable tenant screening report under this section
may require a prospective tenant to certify that there has not been a material change to
the tenant’s name, address, bankruptcy status, criminal history, or eviction history since
the date that the report was generated.
(f) Prior to the execution of a lease agreement, a landlord may reject an
application for tenancy if a prospective tenant made a material change to a reusable tenant
screening report.
Article – State Government
20–701.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) (1) “CONSUMER CREDIT HISTORY” MEANS ANY WRITTEN ACCOUNT
BY A CREDIT REPORTING AGENCY BEARING ON A CONSUMER’S CREDITWORTHINESS,
CREDIT STANDING, OR CREDIT CAPACITY.
(2) “CONSUMER CREDIT HISTORY” INCLUDES:
(I) A CONSUMER CREDIT REPORT; AND
(II) A CREDIT SCORE.
(C) (1) “Disability” means:
(i) a physical or mental impairment that substantially limits one or
more of an individual’s major life activities;

HOUSE BILL 242
(ii) a record of having a physical or mental impairment that
substantially limits one or more of an individual’s major life activities; or
(iii) being regarded as having a physical or mental impairment that
substantially limits one or more of an individual’s major life activities.
(2) “Disability” does not include the current illegal use of or addiction to:
(i) a controlled dangerous substance, as defined in § 5–101 of the
Criminal Law Article; or
(ii) a controlled substance, as defined in 21 U.S.C. § 802.
[(c)] (D) “Discriminatory housing practice” means an act that is prohibited
under § 20–705, § 20–706, § 20–707, or § 20–708 of this subtitle.
[(d)] (E) “Dwelling” means:
(1) any building, structure, or portion of a building or structure that is
occupied, or designed or intended for occupancy, as a residence by one or more families; and
(2) any vacant land that is offered for sale or lease for the construction or
location on the land of any building, structure, or portion of a building or structure
described in item (1) of this subsection.
[(e)] (F) (1) “Familial status” means the status of one or more minors who
are domiciled with:
(i) a parent or other person having legal custody of the minor; or
(ii) the designee of a parent or other person having legal custody of
the minor with the written permission of the parent or other person.
(2) “Familial status” includes the status of being:
(i) a pregnant woman; or
(ii) an individual who is in the process of securing legal custody of a
minor.
[(f)] (G) “Family” includes a single individual.
[(g)] (H) “In the business of selling or renting dwellings” means:
(1) within the preceding 12 months, participating as a principal in three or
more transactions involving the sale or rental of any dwelling or any interest in a dwelling;

HOUSE BILL 242 5
(2) within the preceding 12 months, participating as an agent, other than
in the sale of the individual’s own personal residence, in providing sales or rental facilities
or services in two or more transactions involving the sale or rental of any dwelling or any
interest in a dwelling; or
(3) being the owner of any dwelling occupied, or designed or intended for
occupancy, by five or more families.
[(h)] (I) “Marital status” means the state of being single, married, separated,
divorced, or widowed.
[(i)] (J) “Rent” includes to lease, sublease, let, or otherwise grant for a
consideration the right to occupy premises not owned by the occupant.
[(j)] (K) (1) “Source of income” means any lawful source of money paid
directly or indirectly to or on behalf of a renter or buyer of housing.
(2) “Source of income” includes income from:
(i) a lawful profession, occupation, or job;
(ii) any government or private assistance, grant, loan, or rental
assistance program, including low–income housing assistance certificates and vouchers
issued under the United States Housing Act of 1937;
(iii) a gift, an inheritance, a pension, an annuity, alimony, child
support, or any other consideration or benefit; or
(iv) the sale or pledge of property or an interest in property.
20–702.
(a) It is the policy of the State:
(1) to provide for fair housing throughout the State to all, regardless of
race, color, religion, sex, familial status, national origin, marital status, sexual orientation,
gender identity, disability, source of income, [or] military status, OR CONSUMER CREDIT
HISTORY; and
(2) to that end, to prohibit discriminatory practices with respect to
residential housing by any person, in order to protect and ensure the peace, health, safety,
prosperity, and general welfare of all.
(b) This subtitle:
(1) is an exercise of the police power of the State for the protection of the

HOUSE BILL 242
people of the State; and
(2) shall be administered and enforced by the Commission and, as provided
in this title, enforced by the appropriate State court.
20–704.
(a) This subtitle does not apply to:
(1) the sale or rental of a single–family dwelling, if the dwelling is sold or
rented without:
(i) the use of the sales or rental facilities or services of any:
1. real estate broker, agent, or salesperson;
2. agent of any real estate broker, agent, or salesperson;
3. person in the business of selling or renting dwellings; or
4. agent of a person in the business of selling or renting
dwellings; or
(ii) the publication, posting, or mailing, after notice, of any
advertisement or written notice in violation of this subtitle; and
(2) with respect to discrimination on the basis of sex, sexual orientation,
gender identity, marital status, military status, CONSUMER CREDIT HISTORY, or source
of income if the source of income is low–income housing assistance certificates or vouchers
issued under the United States Housing Act of 1937:
(i) the rental of rooms in any dwelling, if the owner maintains the
dwelling as the owner’s principal residence; or
(ii) the rental of any apartment in a dwelling that contains not more
than five rental units, if the owner maintains the dwelling as the owner’s principal
residence.
(b) The use of attorneys, escrow agents, abstractors, title companies, and other
similar professional assistance as necessary to perfect or transfer the title to a
single–family dwelling does not subject a person to this subtitle if the person otherwise
would be exempted under subsection (a) of this section.
(c) (1) (i) In this subsection, “housing for older persons” means housing:
1. provided under any State or federal program that is
specifically designed and operated to assist elderly persons, as defined in the State or

HOUSE BILL 242 7
federal program;
2. intended for, and solely occupied by, persons who are at
least 62 years old;
3. intended and operated for occupancy by at least one person
who is at least 55 years old in each unit; or
4. that meets the requirements set forth in regulations
adopted by the Secretary of Housing and Urban Development under 42 U.S.C. §
3607(b)(2)(C).
(ii) “Housing for older persons” includes:
1. unoccupied units, if the units are reserved for occupancy
by persons who meet the age requirements of subparagraph (i) of this paragraph; or
2. units occupied as of September 13, 1988 by persons who
do not meet the age requirements of subparagraph (i) of this paragraph, if the new occupant
of the unit meets the age requirement.
(2) The provisions in this subtitle concerning familial status do not apply
to housing for older persons.
(d) The prohibitions in this subtitle against discrimination based on source of
income do not:
(1) prohibit a person from determining the ability of a potential buyer or
renter to pay a purchase price or pay rent by verifying in a commercially reasonable and
nondiscriminatory manner the source and amount of income [or creditworthiness] of the
potential buyer or renter;
(2) prevent a person from refusing to consider income derived from any
criminal activity; or
(3) prohibit a person from determining, in accordance with applicable
federal and State laws, the ability of a potential buyer to repay a mortgage loan.
20–705.
Except as provided in §§ 20–703 and 20–704 of this subtitle, a person may not:
(1) refuse to sell or rent after the making of a bona fide offer, refuse to
negotiate for the sale or rental of, or otherwise make unavailable or deny, a dwelling to any
person because of race, color, religion, sex, disability, marital status, familial status, sexual
orientation, gender identity, national origin, source of income, [or] military status, OR
CONSUMER CREDIT HISTORY;

HOUSE BILL 242
(2) discriminate against any person in the terms, conditions, or privileges
of the sale or rental of a dwelling, or in the provision of services or facilities in connection
with the sale or rental of a dwelling, because of race, color, religion, sex, disability, marital
status, familial status, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, source of
income, [or] military status, OR CONSUMER CREDIT HISTORY;
(3) make, print, or publish, or cause to be made, printed, or published, any
notice, statement, or advertisement with respect to the sale or rental of a dwelling that
indicates any preference, limitation, or discrimination based on race, color, religion, sex,
disability, marital status, familial status, sexual orientation, gender identity, national
origin, source of income, [or] military status, OR CONSUMER CREDIT HISTORY, or an
intention to make any preference, limitation, or discrimination;
(4) represent to any person, because of race, color, religion, sex, disability,
marital status, familial status, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, source
of income, [or] military status, OR CONSUMER CREDIT HISTORY, that any dwelling is not
available for inspection, sale, or rental when the dwelling is available; or
(5) for profit, induce or attempt to induce any person to sell or rent any
dwelling by representations regarding the entry or prospective entry into the neighborhood
of a person of a particular race, color, religion, sex, disability, marital status, familial status,
sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, source of income, [or] military status,
OR CONSUMER CREDIT HISTORY.
20–707.
(a) In this section, “residential real estate–related transaction” means:
(1) the making or purchasing of loans or providing other financial
assistance:
(i) for purchasing, constructing, improving, repairing, or
maintaining a dwelling; or
(ii) secured by residential real estate; or
(2) the selling, brokering, or appraising of residential real property.
(b) (1) A person whose business includes engaging in residential real
estate–related transactions may not discriminate against any person in making available
a transaction, or in the terms or conditions of a transaction, because of race, color, religion,
sex, disability, marital status, familial status, sexual orientation, gender identity, national
origin, source of income, [or] military status, OR CONSUMER CREDIT HISTORY.
(2) Paragraph (1) of this subsection does not prohibit a person engaged in

HOUSE BILL 242 9
the business of furnishing appraisals of real property from taking into consideration factors
other than race, color, religion, sex, disability, marital status, familial status, sexual
orientation, gender identity, national origin, source of income, [or] military status, OR
CONSUMER CREDIT HISTORY.
(c) A person may not, because of race, color, religion, sex, disability, marital
status, familial status, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, source of
income, [or] military status, OR CONSUMER CREDIT HISTORY:
(1) deny a person access to, or membership or participation in, a
multiple–listing service, real estate brokers’ organization, or other service, organization, or
facility relating to the business of selling or renting dwellings; or
(2) discriminate against a person in the terms or conditions of membership
or participation.
20–1103.
(a) In this section, “CONSUMER CREDIT HISTORY”, “disability”, “dwelling”,
“familial status”, “marital status”, “rent”, and “source of income” have the meanings stated
in § 20–701 of this title.
(b) Whether or not acting under color of law, a person may not, by force or threat
of force, willfully injure, intimidate, interfere with, or attempt to injure, intimidate, or
interfere with:
(1) any person because of race, color, religion, sex, disability, marital
status, familial status, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, source of
income, [or] military status, OR CONSUMER CREDIT HISTORY and because the person is
or has been:
(i) selling, purchasing, renting, financing, occupying, or contracting
or negotiating for the sale, purchase, rental, financing, or occupation of any dwelling; or
(ii) applying for or participating in any service, organization, or
facility relating to the business of selling or renting dwellings;
(2) any person because the person is or has been, or in order to intimidate
the person or any other person or any class of persons from:
(i) participating, without discrimination on account of race, color,
religion, sex, disability, marital status, familial status, sexual orientation, gender identity,
national origin, source of income, [or] military status, OR CONSUMER CREDIT HISTORY,
in any of the activities, services, organizations, or facilities described in item (1) of this
subsection; or

HOUSE BILL 242
(ii) affording another person or class of persons the opportunity or
protection to participate in any of the activities, services, organizations, or facilities
described in item (1) of this subsection; or
(3) any person because the person is or has been, or in order to discourage
the person or any other person from:
(i) lawfully aiding or encouraging other persons to participate,
without discrimination on account of race, color, religion, sex, disability, marital status,
familial status, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, source of income, [or]
military status, OR CONSUMER CREDIT HISTORY, in any of the activities, services,
organizations, or facilities described in item (1) of this subsection; or
(ii) participating lawfully in speech or peaceful assembly opposing
any denial of the opportunity to participate in any of the activities, services, organizations,
or facilities described in item (1) of this subsection.
(c) A person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction
is subject to:
(1) imprisonment not exceeding 1 year or a fine not exceeding $1,000 or
both;
(2) if the violation results in bodily injury, imprisonment not exceeding 10
years or a fine not exceeding $10,000 or both; or
(3) if the violation results in death, imprisonment not exceeding life.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act does not limit the
rights or remedies that otherwise are available to a landlord or tenant under any other law.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.